Utah, session 2026, HB339.
Section 1. Section 26B-4-327 is enacted to read:26B-4-327. Street medicine.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Street medicine" means health care that is provided by a licensed health care provider, who conducts patient visits outside of a health care facility, clinic, or shelter to an individual experiencing unsheltered homelessness.(b)(i)"Unsheltered homelessness" means not having a long-term or permanent structure in which to live.(ii)"Unsheltered homelessness" may include sleeping in a vehicle, abandoned building, farm, wilderness, street, park, or encampment.(2)A person providing street medicine shall not engage in conduct that requires a license under Title 58, Occupations and Professions, unless the person holds the applicable license.(3)A street medicine provider may dispense and administer a long-acting injectable in accordance with Section 58-88-202.(4)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department may make rules permitting the department and street medicine providers to share and receive certain health information with the Utah Homeless Management Information System, described in Section 35A-16-202.(5)On or before July 1, 2026, the department shall, with the input of organizations currently delivering street medicine, develop and publish guidelines, standards, and best practices for street medicine providers, including:(a)recommended procedures relating to Medicaid coverage and reimbursement; and(b)available community resources that serve individuals experiencing homelessness.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.